Hawaii statutes.
[§658G-10]
Low income parties. (a) The disqualification of section
658G-9(a) applies to a collaborative lawyer representing a party with or
without fee.

(b) After a collaborative law process
concludes, another lawyer in a law firm with which a collaborative lawyer
disqualified under section 658G-9(a) is associated may represent a party
without fee in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the
collaborative matter if:

(1) The party has an annual income that qualifies the
party for free legal representation under the criteria established by the law
firm for free legal representation;

(2) The collaborative law participation agreement so
provides; and

(3) The collaborative lawyer is isolated from any
participation in the collaborative matter or a matter related to the
collaborative matter through procedures within the law firm which are
reasonably calculated to isolate the collaborative lawyer from that
participation. [L 2012, c 207, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next